Massachusetts, session 194th, S3093.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding chapter 132B of the General Laws or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the town of Andover may regulate through local bylaw and/or board
of health regulation or ordinance the use of first and second generation anticoagulant
rodenticides within the town of Andover, including prohibiting the use of such pesticides by
licensed commercial applicators as defined in 333 C.MR. 10.00 for the purposes of protecting
wildlife, pets and people from non-target poisoning.
SECTION 2. This Act will take effect upon its passage.
of 1